Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 2. Licensing Providers of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
§ 37.2-418.
Revocation, suspension, or refusal of licenses; resumption of operation; summary suspension under certain circumstances; penalty.

The Commissioner is authorized to revoke or suspend any license issued hereunder or refuse issuance of a license on any of the following grounds: (i) violation of any provision of this article or of any applicable regulation made pursuant to such provisions; (ii) permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of an illegal act in services delivered by the provider; or (iii) conduct or practices detrimental to the welfare of any individual receiving services from the provider.

Whenever the Commissioner revokes, suspends, or denies a license, the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall apply. Any person aggrieved by the final decision of the Commissioner to refuse to issue a license or by his revocation or suspension of a license is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act.

If a license is revoked or refused as herein provided, a new application for license may be considered by the Commissioner when the conditions upon which the action was based have been corrected and satisfactory evidence of this fact has been furnished. In no event may an applicant reapply for a license after the Commissioner has refused or revoked a license until a period of six months from the effective date of that action has elapsed, unless the Commissioner in his sole discretion believes that there has been such a change in the conditions causing refusal of the prior application or revocation of the license as to justify considering the new application. When an appeal is taken by the applicant pursuant to this section, the six-month period shall be extended until a final decision has been rendered on appeal. A new license may then be granted after proper inspection has been made and all provisions of this article and applicable regulations made thereunder have been complied with and recommendations to that effect have been made to the Commissioner upon the basis of an inspection by any authorized inspector or agent of the Department.

Suspension of a license shall in all cases be for an indefinite time and the suspension may be lifted and rights under the license fully or partially restored at such time as the Commissioner determines, based on an inspection, that the rights of the licensee appear to so require and the interests of the public will not be jeopardized by resumption of operation.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsection F and in addition to the authority provided in subsections A through D, the Commissioner may issue a summary order of suspension of the license of a group home or residential facility for children, in conjunction with any proceeding for revocation, denial, or other action, when conditions or practices exist in the home or facility that pose an immediate and substantial threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the children who are residents and the Commissioner believes the operation should be suspended during the pendency of such proceeding.

The summary order of suspension shall take effect upon its issuance and shall be served on the licensee or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service and certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the licensee. The order shall state the time, date, and location of a hearing to determine whether the suspension is appropriate. Such hearing shall be held no later than three business days after the issuance of the summary order of suspension and shall be convened by the Commissioner or his designee.After such hearing, the Commissioner may issue a final order of summary suspension or may find that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented. A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the licensee may appeal the Commissioner’s decision to the appropriate circuit court no later than 10 days following issuance of the order. The sole issue before the court shall be whether the Commissioner had reasonable grounds to require the licensee to cease operations during the pendency of the concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding. The concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding shall not be affected by the outcome of any hearing on the appropriateness of the summary suspension.The willful and material failure to comply with the summary order of suspension or final order of summary suspension shall be punishable as a Class 2 misdemeanor. The Commissioner may require the cooperation of any other agency or subdivision of the Commonwealth in the relocation of children who are residents of a home or facility whose license has been summarily suspended pursuant to this section and in any other actions necessary to reduce the risk of further harm to children.

The Commissioner shall inform other public agencies that provide funds to a provider, including the Departments of Social Services and Medical Assistance Services, when a provider’s license is suspended, revoked, or denied in accordance with this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-258.1, 37-258.2; 1960, c. 496; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-185, 37.1-186; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1984, c. 582; 1986, cc. 104, 615; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, cc. 363, 485, 716; 2006, c. 168; 2014, c. 497.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 363 and 485, amended former § 37.1-185, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by cc, 363 and 485 were given effect in this section by adding subsections E and F.

Acts 2005, cc. 363 and 485, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, c. 363 and 485, cl. 3 provides: “That the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services shall establish a protocol for the expedited appointment of a hearing officer for the summary suspension of licenses in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2006, c. 168, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the State Board of Juvenile Justice, and the Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 168 inserted “summary suspension under certain circumstances” in the section heading; and substituted “Commissioner” for “Department” in the third sentence of the second paragraph in subsection F.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 497 added subsection G.

§ 37.2-419.
Human rights and licensing enforcement and sanctions; notice.

As used in this section, “special order” means an administrative order issued to any party licensed or funded by the Department that has a stated duration of not more than 12 months and that may include a civil penalty that shall not exceed $500 per violation per day, prohibition of new admissions, or reduction of licensed capacity for violations of §

37.2-400

, the licensing or human rights regulations, or this article.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, following a proceeding as provided in §

2.2-4019

, the Commissioner may issue a special order for a violation of any of the provisions of §

37.2-400

or any regulation adopted under any provision of §

37.2-400

or of this article that adversely affects the human rights of individuals receiving services or poses an imminent and substantial threat to the health, safety, or welfare of individuals receiving services. The issuance of a special order shall be considered a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

. The Commissioner shall not delegate his authority to impose civil penalties in conjunction with the issuance of special orders. The Commissioner may take the following actions to sanction public and private providers licensed or funded by the Department for noncompliance with §

37.2-400

, the human rights regulations, or this article that are the subject of a special order:

Place any service of any such provider on probation upon finding that it is substantially out of compliance with the licensing or human rights regulations and that the health or safety of individuals receiving services is at risk.

Reduce licensed capacity or prohibit new admissions when he concludes that the provider cannot or will not make necessary corrections to achieve compliance with licensing or human rights regulations except by a temporary restriction of its scope of service.

Require that probationary status announcements and denial or revocation notices be of sufficient size and distinction and be posted in a prominent place at each public entrance of the affected service.

Mandate training for the provider’s employees, with any costs to be borne by the provider, when he concludes that the lack of training has led directly to violations of licensing or human rights regulations.

Assess civil penalties of not more than $500 per violation per day upon finding that the licensed or funded provider is substantially out of compliance with the licensing or human rights regulations and that the health or safety of individuals receiving services is at risk.

Withhold funds from licensed or funded providers receiving public funds that are in violation of the licensing or human rights regulations upon finding that the licensed or funded provider is substantially out of compliance and that the health or safety of individuals receiving services is at risk.

The Commissioner shall inform other public agencies that provide funds to a provider, including the Departments of Social Services and Medical Assistance Services, that a special order has been issued in accordance with this section.

The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

1999, c. 969, § 37.1-185.1; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, c. 497.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” twice in the introductory paragraph, and in subdivisions 1 and 5.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 497, in subsection B, inserted “that are the subject of a special order”; deleted “provisional licenses” following “announcements” in subdivision B 3; in subdivision B 6 substituted “licensed or funded providers” for “licensees or programs” and inserted “upon finding that the licensed or funded provider is substantially out of compliance and that the health or safety of individuals receiving services is at risk”; and in subsection C substituted “a provider” for “the licensee or the program” and “that a special order has been issued in accordance with this section” for “of any licensee or program that is in violation of the licensing or human rights regulations.”

§ 37.2-419.1.
Summary suspension of adult facility licenses under certain circumstances; due process; penalty.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsection B and in addition to the authority for other disciplinary actions provided in this chapter, the Commissioner may issue a summary order of suspension of the license of any group home or residential facility for adults, in conjunction with any proceeding for revocation, denial, or other action, when conditions or practices exist in the home or facility that pose an immediate and substantial threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the adults who are residents and the Commissioner believes the operation of the home or facility should be suspended during the pendency of such proceeding.

The summary order of suspension shall take effect upon its issuance and shall be served on the licensee or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service and certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the licensee. The order shall state the time, date, and location of a hearing to determine whether the suspension is appropriate. Such hearing shall be held no later than three business days after the issuance of the summary order of suspension and shall be convened by the Commissioner or his designee.After such hearing, the Commissioner may issue a final order of summary suspension or may find that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented. A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the licensee may appeal the Commissioner’s decision to the appropriate circuit court no later than 10 days following issuance of the order. The sole issue before the court shall be whether the Commissioner had reasonable grounds to require the licensee to cease operations during the pendency of the concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding. The concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding shall not be affected by the outcome of any hearing on the appropriateness of the summary suspension.The willful and material failure to comply with the summary order of suspension or final order of summary suspension shall be punishable as a Class 2 misdemeanor. The Commissioner may require the cooperation of any other agency or subdivision of the Commonwealth in the relocation of adults who are residents of a home or facility whose license has been summarily suspended pursuant to this section and in any other actions necessary to reduce the risk of further harm to such residents.

History.

2006, c. 168.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 168, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the State Board of Juvenile Justice, and the Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

§ 37.2-420.
Offer or payment of remuneration in exchange for referral prohibited.

No provider licensed pursuant to this article shall knowingly and willfully offer or pay any remuneration directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce any practitioner of the healing arts or any clinical psychologist licensed under the provisions of Chapters 29 (§

54.1-2900

et seq.) and 36 ( §

54.1-3600

et seq.) of Title 54.1 to refer
a person or persons to any service of the provider. The term “remuneration” excludes any payments, business arrangements, or payment practices not prohibited by 42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7b(b), as amended, or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

History.

1990, c. 379, § 37.1-186.1; 1996, cc. 937, 980; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “refer a person or persons to” for “refer an individual or individuals to” in the first sentence and “42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7b(b)” for “Title 42, Section 1320a-7b(b) of the United States Code” in the second sentence.

§ 37.2-421.
Advertising by licensed providers.

The Board shall adopt regulations governing advertising practices of any provider licensed pursuant to this article. The regulations shall require that any provider’s advertisement not contain false or misleading information or false or misleading representations as to fees charged for services.

History.

1990, c. 809, § 37.1-188.1; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-421.1.
Supportive housing providers.

The Department may enter into an agreement for the provision of supportive housing for individuals receiving auxiliary grants pursuant to §

51.5-160

with any provider licensed to provide mental health community support services, intensive community treatment, programs of assertive community treatment, supportive in-home services, or supervised living residential services. Such agreement shall include requirements for (i) individualized supportive housing service plans for every individual receiving supportive housing services, (ii) access to skills training for every individual receiving supportive housing services, (iii) assistance with accessing available community-based services and supports for every individual receiving supportive housing services, (iv) recipient-level outcome data reporting, (v) adherence to identified supportive housing program components, (vi) initial identification and ongoing review of the level of care needs for each recipient, (vii) ongoing monitoring of services described in the recipient’s individualized supportive housing service plan, and (viii) annual inspections by the Department or its designee to determine whether the provider is in compliance with the requirements of the agreement.

Supportive housing provided or facilitated by providers entering into agreements with the Department pursuant to this section shall include appropriate support services in the least restrictive and most integrated setting practicable for the recipient. Residential settings where supportive housing services are provided shall (i) comply with federal habitability standards, (ii) provide cooking and bathroom facilities in each unit, (iii) afford dignity and privacy to the recipient, (iv) include rights of tenancy pursuant to the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq.), (v) provide rental levels that leave sufficient funds for other necessary living expenses, and (vi) not admit or retain recipients who require ongoing, onsite, 24-hour supervision and care or recipients who have any of the conditions or care needs described in subsection D of §

63.2-1805

.

The Department may revoke any agreement pursuant to subsection A if the Department determines that the provider has violated the terms of the agreement or any federal or state law or regulation and enter into an agreement with another provider to ensure uninterrupted supportive housing to the auxiliary grant recipient.

History.

2016, c. 567.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 567, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 180 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2016, c. 567, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall develop guidance documents for implementation of the provisions of this act no later than January 1, 2017. In developing such guidance documents, the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall provide notice to the public and opportunity for public comment and public participation.”

Acts 2016, c. 567, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective if they conflict with any federal law or regulation or any guidance document provided by the U.S. Social Security Administration.”

Acts 2016, c. 567, cl. 5 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall seek to amend the state plan for medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and any waivers thereof, to implement the necessary changes pursuant to the provisions of this act. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall have authority to implement such changes upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and prior to the completion of the regulatory process.”

Acts 2016, c. 567, cl. 6 provides: “That the number of auxiliary grant recipients in the supportive housing setting shall not exceed 60.”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-1200” for “55-248.2.”

§ 37.2-422.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this article or any applicable regulation made under such provisions shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and each day, or part thereof, of continuation of any such violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-260; 1960, c. 496; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-189; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.